Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-310 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Respect for


Citizens Act of 2025".


B. If a driver license is of a class of licenses issued by


another state exclusively to undocumented immigrants who are unable


to prove lawful presence in the United States when the licenses are


issued, the driver license or other permit purporting to authorize


the holder to operate a motor vehicle on public roadways, is invalid


in the State of Oklahoma and does not authorize the holder to

Req. No. 10991 Page 1


operate a motor vehicle in this state. Such classes of licenses


include licenses that are issued exclusively to undocumented


immigrants or licenses that are substantially the same as licenses


issued to citizens, residents, or those lawfully present in the


United States but have markings establishing that the license holder


did not exercise the option of providing proof of lawful presence.


C. A law enforcement officer or other authorized representative


of the law enforcement agency who stops a person driving with an


invalid license as described in subsection B of this section and


driving without a valid license shall issue a citation to the driver


for driving without a license.


D. To facilitate the enforcement of this section and to aid in


providing notice to the public and visitors of invalid licenses, law


enforcement agencies shall maintain on their websites a list of out-


of-state classes of driver licenses that are invalid in this state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-10991 JBH 12/16/24













Req. No. 10991 Page 2